District of Columbia statutes.
2-1535.05

Retaliation.

(a)

An employee, volunteer, or youth shall not retaliate against a victim or witness of bullying or a person who reports bullying.

(b)

An employee or volunteer who has witnessed bullying in violation of a bullying prevention policy that is consistent with § 2-1535.03(a), or has reliable information that a person has been subject to bullying in violation of a bullying prevention policy that is consistent with § 2-1535.03(a), shall report the incident or information to the person designated by the agency, educational institution, or grantee, in accordance with § 2-1535.03(b)(7), as responsible for investigating the reports.

(c)

An employee, volunteer, or youth who promptly and in good faith reports an incident of, or information on, bullying in compliance with the policy of the agency, educational institution, or grantee shall be immune from a cause of action for damages arising from the making of such report.

Sept. 14, 2012, D.C. Law 19-167, § 6, 59 DCR 7820